hu: Borotvakrém összetétele: Hab; Gél; Egyéb
pt-BR: Formulação do creme de barbear: Espuma; Gel; Outro
sk-SK: Konzistencia krému na holenie: Pena; Gél; Iné
ja: シェービングクリームのタイプ: フォーム; ゲル; その他
es: Formulación de la crema de afeitar: Espuma; Gel; Otros
el: Σύνθεση κρέμας ξυρίσματος: Αφρός; Τζελ; Άλλο
sl-SI: Formulacija kreme za britje: Pena; Gel; Drugo
zh-CN: 剃须膏配方: 泡沫; 发胶; 其他
hr-HR: Formulacija kreme za brijanje: Pjena; Gel; Ostalo
nl: Formule scheerschuim: Schuim; Gel; Andere
sv: Rakgelsformula: Skum; Gel; Övrigt
ko: 면도용 크림 제형: 거품; 젤; 기타
vi: Công thức kem cạo râu: Bọt xốp; Gel; Khác
fi: Partavaahdon formulointi: Vaahto; Geeli; Muu
en: Shaving cream formulation: Foam; Gel; Other
th: สูตรครีมโกนหนวด: โฟม; เจล; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Formulação do creme de barbear: Espuma; Gel; Outro
it: Formulazione della crema da barba: Schiuma; Gel; Altro
nb: Formulering av barberkrem: Skum; Gel; Annet
lt-LT: Skutimosi kremo formulė: Porolonas; Gelis; Kita
zh-TW: 刮鬍膏配方: 泡棉; 凝膠; 其他
ro-RO: Formula cremă de ras: Spumă; Gel; Altele
de: Rasierschaumformulierung: Schaumstoff; Gel; Sonstiges
cs: Skupenství krému na holení: Pěna; Gel; Jiné
ru: Формула крема для бритья: Пена; Гель; Другое
tr: Tıraş kremi formülasyonu: Köpük; Jel; Diğer
fr: Formule de la crème à raser: Mousse; Gel; Autre
pl: Formuła kremu do golenia: Piana; Żel; Inne
da: Barbercremeformulering: Skum; Gel; Andet
bg-BG: Състав на крем за бръснене: Пяна; Гел; Други